Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.440

Bond owner may enforce collection.

If the city shall fail, neglect, or refuse to pay said bonds or to promptly collect any such assessments when due, the owner of any such bonds may proceed in his or her own name to collect such assessment and foreclose the lien thereof in any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall in addition to the principal of such bonds and interest thereon, recover five percent of such sum, together with the costs of such suit. Any number of owners of such bonds for any single improvement may join as plaintiffs and any number of owners of the property on which the same are a lien may be joined as defendants in such suit.

[ 2011 c 336 s 268; 1983 c 167 s 14; 1915 c 154 s 15; RRS s 9267.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 17 through 25.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.